Hawaii statutes.
§350E-4 Appropriate authority in Hawaii.
As used in paragraph (a) of Article V the phrase "appropriate authority in
the receiving state" with reference to this State means the department of
human services. [L 1985, c 132, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 339, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next